North Carolina statutes. Chapter 108A. Social Services.
Part 6. Medical Assistance Program.
“The Department shall make every effort to expedite the implementation of the enhancements. The Office of Information Technology Services shall work in cooperation with the Department to ensure the timely and effective implementation of the MMIS and enhancements. The contract between the Department and the contract vendor shall contain an explicit provision requiring that the MMIS have the capability to fully implement the administration of NC Health Choice, NC Kids’ Care, Ticket to Work, Families Pay Part of the Cost of Services under the CAP MR/DD, CAP Children’s Program, and all relevant Medicaid waivers and the Medicare 646 waiver as it applies to Medicaid eligibles. The Department must have detailed cost information for each requirement before signing the contract. Any contract between the Department and a vendor for the MMIS that does not contain the explicit provision required under this subsection is void on its face. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the Secretary of the Department does not have the authority to sign a contract for the MMIS if the contract does not contain the explicit provision required under this section.

“(d) The Department shall develop a comprehensive schedule for the development and implementation of the MMIS that fully incorporates federal and State project management and review requirements. The Department shall ensure that the schedule is as accurate as possible. Any changes to the design, development, and implementation schedule shall be reported as part of the Department’s quarterly MMIS reporting requirements. The Department shall submit the schedule to the Chairs of the House of Representatives Committee on Appropriations and the House of Representatives Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, and the Fiscal Research Division. Any change to key milestones in either schedule shall be immediately reported to the Chairs of the House of Representatives Committee on Appropriations and the House of Representatives Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, and the Fiscal Research Division with a full explanation of the reason for the change.

“(e) Beginning July 1, 2009, the Department shall make quarterly reports on changes in the functionality and projected costs of the MMIS. The first quarterly submission shall contain a final report on the contract award to include total costs and functionality of the MMIS. Each report shall be made to the Chairs of the House of Representatives Committee on Appropriations and the House of Representatives Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, and the Fiscal Research Division. A copy of the final report on the contract award also shall be submitted to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations.

“(f) Upon initiation of the NC MMIS Program Reporting and Analytics Project and the Division of Health Services Regulation Project, the Department shall submit all reports regarding functionality, schedule, and cost in the next regular cycle of reporting identified in subsections (d) and (e) of this section. The Department shall ensure that the solution developed in the Reporting and Analytics Project supports the capability, in its initial implementation, to interface with the North Carolina Teachers’ and State Employees’ Health Plan. The costs for this capability shall be negotiated prior to the award of the Reporting and Analytics Project contract. The Reporting and Analytics Project solution must be completed simultaneously with the replacement MMIS.”

For prior similar provisions, see Session Laws
2008-107, s. 10.9(c)-(e).

Session Laws
2011-145, s. 10.29(a)-(i), provides: “(a) By August 1, 2011, the Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services shall provide detailed cost information on the replacement Medicaid Management Information System (MMIS) to the Chairs of the House of Representatives Committee on Appropriations and the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Appropriations and Base Budget and the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Information Technology, the Fiscal Research Division, and the Office of State Budget and Management. This information shall include the following:

“(1) The original total cost of MMIS, by year, to include five years of operations and maintenance.

“(2) The current total cost of MMIS, to include five years of operations and maintenance.

“(3) Detailed information on costs associated with each MMIS project, to include the original cost, the current cost, and the reasons for any changes.

“(4) A list of change requests and amendments to the original contract and the costs associated with each.

“(5) Costs for continuing the legacy MMIS beyond the original completion date for the new MMIS, with detailed information on funding sources for those costs.

“(6) Original costs for each vendor associated with the contract, the current costs for each, and the reasons for any increases in cost.

“(b) The Secretary may utilize prior year earned revenue received for the replacement MMIS in the amount of three million two hundred thirty-two thousand three hundred four dollars ($3,232,304) in fiscal year 2011-2012 and twelve million dollars ($12,000,000) in fiscal year 2012-2013. The Department shall utilize prior year earned revenues received for the procurement, design, development, and implementation of the replacement MMIS. In the event the Department does not receive prior year earned revenues in the amounts authorized by this section, or funds are insufficient to advance the project, the Department is authorized, with approval of the Office of State Budget and Management (OSBM), and after consulting with the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations, to utilize overrealized receipts and funds appropriated to the Department to achieve the level of funding specified in this section for the replacement MMIS. If the department requires funding beyond the prior year earned revenue specified in this section, the Department shall immediately report to the Chairs of the House of Representatives Committee on Appropriations and the House of Representatives Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Information Technology, the Fiscal Research Division, and the Office of State Budget and Management. The report shall include the following:

“(1) The amount of the shortfall.

“(2) The sources of funding the Department plans to use to make up for the shortfall.

“(3) The impact on the programs or operations from which the funding is to be taken.

“(c) The Department shall make full development of the replacement MMIS a top priority. During the development and implementation of the replacement MMIS, the Department shall develop plans to ensure the timely and effective implementation of enhancements to the system to provide the following capabilities:

“(1) Receiving and tracking premiums or other payments required by law.

“(2) Compatibility with the Health Information System.

“(d) The Department shall make every effort to expedite the implementation of the enhancements. The contract between the Department and each contract vendor shall contain an explicit provision requiring the replacement MMIS to have the capability to fully implement the administration of NC Health Choice, NC Kids’ Care, Ticket to Work, Families Pay Part of the Cost of Services under the CAP-MR/CC, CAP Children’s Program, and all relevant Medicaid waivers and the Medicare 646 waiver as it applies to Medicaid eligibles. The Department must have detailed cost information for each requirement before signing the contract and must immediately provide that cost information to the Chairs of the House of Representatives Committee on Appropriations and the House of Representatives Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Information Technology, the Fiscal Research Division, and the Office of State Budget and Management. Any sole source contract must meet all State requirements and must have the written approval of the State CIO. Any decision to sole source any portion of the contract shall immediately be reported to the Chairs of the House of Representatives Committee on Appropriations and the House of Representatives Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Information Technology, the Fiscal Research Division, and the Office of State Budget and Management.

“(e) The Office of the State Chief Information Officer (SCIO) and the Office of Information Technology Services (ITS) shall work in cooperation with the Department to ensure the timely and effective implementation of the replacement MMIS and enhancements. The SCIO shall ensure that the replacement MMIS meets all State requirements for project management and shall immediately report any failure to meet State project management requirements to the Chairs of the House of Representatives Committee on Appropriations and the House of Representatives Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Information Technology, the Fiscal Research Division, and the Office of State Budget and Management. The SCIO shall also immediately report if any replacement MMIS project, or portion of a project, is listed as red in the project portfolio management tool.

“(f) Notwithstanding

G.S. 114-2.3

, the Department shall engage the services of private counsel with pertinent information technology and computer law expertise to review requests for proposals and to negotiate and review contracts associated with the replacement MMIS. This shall include amendments exceeding ten million dollars ($10,000,000). The counsel engaged by the Department shall review the replacement MMIS contracts and amendments between the Department and the vendor to ensure that the requirements of subsection (d) of this section are met in their entirety and that the terms of the contract are in the State’s best interest.

“(g) By August 1, 2011, the Department shall develop a revised comprehensive schedule for the development and implementation of the replacement MMIS that fully incorporates federal and State project management and review standards. The Department shall ensure that the schedule is accurate. Any changes to the design, development, and implementation schedule shall be reported as part of the Department’s monthly MMIS reporting requirements. The Department shall submit the schedule to the Chairs of the House of Representatives Committee on Appropriations and the House of Representatives Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Information Technology, the Fiscal Research Division, and the Office of State Budget and Management. This submission shall include a detailed explanation of schedule changes that have occurred since the initiation of the project and the cost associated with each change. Any changes to key milestones shall be immediately reported to the Chairs of the House of Representatives Committee on Appropriations and the House of Representatives Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Information Technology, the Fiscal Research Division, and the Office of State Budget and Management, with a full explanation of the reason for the change and any associated costs.

“(h) Beginning July 1, 2011, the Department shall make quarterly reports on the progress of the development and implementation of the replacement MMIS. This report shall include any changes, or anticipated changes, in the scope, functionality, or projected costs. This report shall include any changes to any replacement MMIS vendor contracts and shall provide a detailed explanation of those changes and the associated cost increases. Each report shall be made to the Chairs of the House of Representatives Committee on Appropriations and the House of Representatives Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Information Technology, the Fiscal Research Division, and the Office of State Budget and Management. A copy of the final report on each contract or amendment award shall also be submitted to the Joint Legislative Oversight Commission on Governmental Operations.

“(i) Upon initiation of the NC MMIS Program Reporting and Analytics Project, and the Division of Health Services Regulation Project, the Department shall submit all reports regarding functionality, schedule, and cost in the next regular cycle of reports identified in this section. The Department shall ensure that the solution developed in the Reporting and Analytics Project supports the capability, in its initial implementation, to interface with the State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees. The costs for this capability shall be negotiated prior to the award of the Reporting and Analytics Project contract. The Reporting and Analytics Project solution must be completed simultaneously with the replacement MMIS.”

Session Laws
2013-360, s. 12A.4, as amended by Session Laws
2013-363, s. 4.11, and as amended by Session Laws
2014-100, ss. 12A.4(a), (b), and 12A.5, provides: “(a) The Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services may utilize prior year earned revenue received for the replacement MMIS in the amount of nine million six hundred fifty-eight thousand one hundred fifty-two dollars ($9,658,152) for the 2013-2014 fiscal year and in the amount of six million eight hundred ninety thousand six hundred dollars ($6,890,600) for the 2014-2015 fiscal year. In the event the Department does not receive prior year earned revenues in the amounts authorized by this section, or funds are insufficient to advance the project, the Department may, with prior approval from the Office of State Budget and Management (OSBM), utilize overrealized receipts and funds appropriated to the Department to achieve the level of funding specified in this section for the replacement MMIS.

“(b) The Department shall make full development of the replacement MMIS a top priority. During development and implementation of the replacement MMIS, the Department shall develop plans to ensure the timely and effective implementation of enhancements to the system to provide the following capabilities:

“(1) Receiving and tracking premiums or other payments required by law.

“(2) Compatibility with the Health Information System.

“(c) The Department shall make every effort to expedite the implementation of the enhancements. The replacement MMIS shall have the capability to fully implement the administration of NC Health Choice, Ticket to Work, CAP Children’s Program, all relevant Medicaid waivers, and the Medicare 646 waiver as it applies to Medicaid eligibles.

“(d) The Office of the State Chief Information Officer (SCIO) and the Office of Information Technology Services (ITS) shall work in cooperation with the Department to ensure the timely and effective implementation of the replacement MMIS and any enhancements. The SCIO shall ensure that the replacement MMIS meets all State requirements for project management and shall immediately report any failure to meet these requirements to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Information Technology, the Fiscal Research Division, and the Office of State Budget and Management. The SCIO shall also immediately report if any replacement MMIS project, or portion of a project, is listed as red in the project portfolio management tool.

“(e) Notwithstanding

G.S. 114-2.3

, the Department shall consult with the Office of the SCIO concerning the retention of private counsel for the replacement MMIS, and as directed by the Office of the SCIO, retain private counsel with expertise in pertinent information technology and computer law to negotiate and review contract amendments associated with the replacement MMIS. The private counsel engaged by the Department shall review the replacement MMIS contract amendments between the Department and the vendors to ensure that the requirements of subsection (c) of this section are met in their entirety and that the terms of the contract amendments are in the State’s best interest.

“(f) The Department shall immediately report any changes to the replacement MMIS implementation schedules to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Information Technology, the Fiscal Research Division, and the Office of State Budget and Management, with a full explanation of the reason for the change and any associated costs.

“(g) The Department shall provide the following reports on the replacement MMIS by the dates specified in this subsection to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Information Technology, the Fiscal Research Division, and the Office of State Budget and Management:

“(1) By no later than September 1, 2013, a progress report on full implementation of the replacement MMIS, which shall include at least all of the following:

“a. Any issues encountered following the ‘go live’ date of July 1, 2013, and how each issue was resolved.

“b. Any system requirements for manual workarounds and the time line for implementing an automated solution for each manual workaround.

“c. Required capabilities that are not available in the replacement MMIS on the ‘go live’ date of July 1, 2013, with a date for the implementation of each.

“(2) By no later than November 1, 2013, a progress report on full implementation of the replacement MMIS, which shall include at least all of the following:

“a. An updated estimate of the costs associated with operating and maintaining the system during the 2013-2014 and 2014-2015 fiscal years, with an explanation for any changes from previous submissions.

“b. The cost, if any, associated with the resolution of each issue encountered following the ‘go live’ date of July 1, 2013, and the source of funding for the associated cost.

“c. The cost, if any, associated with any system requirements for manual workarounds, the source of funding used to pay for the associated cost, the cost associated with transitioning to each automated solution, and the source of funding for each identified cost.

“d. A comparison of timeliness and accuracy of payments for legacy system and replacement system transactions, using the same criteria for both.

“e. The cost, if any, associated with implementation of any required capabilities that are not available in the replacement MMIS on the ‘go live’ date of July 1, 2013.

“(3) By no later than December 1, 2013, a plan for the elimination of the Office of Medicaid Management Information System Services (OMMISS) and the transfer of its remaining operations to other Divisions within the Department of Health and Human Services. This plan shall include at least all of the following:

“a. The specific operations to be transferred to other Divisions within the Department, the specific Division to which each operation will be transferred, the State personnel that will be impacted by each transfer, costs associated with each transfer, and sources of funding to enable the identified Divisions to assume these transferred operations.

“b. Any State personnel costs that will result from the dissolution of OMMISS, including the costs of any severance payments and any compensatory time earned during the course of the project, broken down by employee; and any identified sources of funding to pay for these personnel costs.

“c. A plan for transitioning out of the space currently leased by the State for OMMISS, costs associated with this transition, and any savings that will result from the transition.

“(4) By no later than January 15, 2014, a preliminary report on the Department’s plan for achieving system certification, which shall include at least all of the following:

“a. A description of the process.

“b. A detailed time line.

“c. Any issues that could impact the timing of system certification and plans to mitigate identified issues.

“d. Any costs associated with system certification.

“e. Any identified funding sources to pay for costs associated with system certification.

“(h) The Department shall complete the Reporting and Analytics Project solution simultaneously with the implementation of the replacement MMIS.

“(i) Notwithstanding any other provision of law and to the extent permitted by federal law, the Department shall not approve any overtime or compensatory time related to the replacement MMIS after August 1, 2013, without the prior written approval of the Office of State Personnel for each specific instance of overtime or compensatory time. Beginning August 1, 2013, the Department shall submit a monthly report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Information Technology, and the Fiscal Research Division on the total amount of approved overtime and compensatory time related to the replacement MMIS for the preceding calendar month.

“(j) Repealed by Session Laws
2014-100, s. 12A.4(a), (b), effective July 1, 2014.

“(k) Repealed by Session Laws
2014-100, s. 12A.4(a), (b), effective July 1, 2014.”

Session Laws
2009-451, s. 10.62 provides: “Full implementation for the Community Alternatives Programs reimbursement system shall be not later than 12 months after the date on which the replacement Medicaid Management Information System becomes operational and stabilized.”

For prior similar provisions, see Session Laws
2007-323, s. 10.44.

Session Laws
2008-107, s. 10.15A(h2)-(h6), as added by Session Laws
2008-118, s. 3.13(b), and amended by Session Laws
2009-526, s. 2(b), and Session Laws
2009-550, s. 1.1(b) provides: “(h2)(1) Application. — This subsection applies only to contested Medicaid cases commenced by Medicaid applicants or recipients under subsection 10.15A(h1) of this act. Except as otherwise provided by subsection 10.15A(h1) and this subsection governing time lines and procedural steps, a contested Medicaid case commenced by a Medicaid applicant or recipient is subject to the provisions of Article 3 of Chapter 150B. To the extent any provision in this subsection or subsection 10.15A(h1) of this act conflicts with another provision in Article 3 of Chapter 150B, this subsection and subsection 10.15A(h1) controls.

“(2) Simple Procedures. — Notwithstanding any other provision of Article 3 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, the chief administrative law judge may limit and simplify the procedures that apply to a contested Medicaid case involving a Medicaid applicant or recipient in order to complete the case as quickly as possible. To the extent possible, the Office of Administrative Hearings shall schedule and hear all contested Medicaid cases within 55 days of submission of a request for appeal. Hearings shall be conducted telephonically or by video technology, however the recipient or applicant, or the recipient’s or applicant’s representative may request that the hearing be conducted before the administrative law judge in person. An in-person hearing shall be conducted in Wake County, however for good cause shown, the in-person hearing may be conducted in the county of residence of the recipient or applicant. Good cause shall include but is not limited to the applicant’s or recipient’s impairments limiting travel or the unavailability of the applicant’s or recipient’s treating professional witnesses. The Department shall provide written notice to the recipient or applicant of the use of telephonic hearings, hearings by video conference, and in-person hearings before the administrative law judge, and how to request a hearing in the recipient’s or applicant’s county of residence. The simplified procedure may include requiring that all prehearing motions be considered and ruled on by the administrative law judge in the course of the hearing of the case on the merits. An administrative law judge assigned to a contested Medicaid case shall make reasonable efforts in a case involving a Medicaid applicant or recipient who is not represented by an attorney to assure a fair hearing and to maintain a complete record of the hearing. The administrative law judge may allow brief extensions of the time limits contained in this section for good cause and to ensure that the record is complete. Good cause includes delays resulting from untimely receipt of documentation needed to render a decision and other unavoidable and unforeseen circumstances. Continuances shall only be granted in accordance with rules adopted by the Office of Administrative Hearings, and shall not be granted on the day of the hearing, except for good cause shown. If a petitioner fails to make an appearance at a hearing that has been properly noticed via certified mail by the Office of Administrative Hearings, the Office of Administrative Hearings shall immediately dismiss the contested case provision.

“(3) Mediation. — Upon receipt of an appeal request form as provided by subdivision 10.15A(h1)(4) of this act or other clear request for a hearing by a Medicaid applicant or recipient, the Office of Administrative Hearings shall immediately notify the Mediation Network of North Carolina which shall within five days contact the petitioner to offer mediation in an attempt to resolve the dispute. If mediation is accepted, the mediation must be completed within 25 days of submission of the request for appeal. Upon completion of the mediation, the mediator shall inform the Office of Administrative Hearings and the Department within 24 hours of the resolution by facsimile or electronic messaging. If the parties have resolved matters in the mediation, the case shall be dismissed by the Office of Administrative Hearings. The Office of Administrative Hearings shall not conduct any contested Medicaid cases hearings until it has received notice from the mediator assigned that either: (i) the mediation was unsuccessful, or (ii) the petitioner has rejected the offer of mediation, or (iii) the petitioner has failed to appear at a scheduled mediation. Nothing in this subdivision shall restrict the right to a contested case hearing.

“(4) Burden of Proof. — The petitioner has the burden of proof to show entitlement to a requested benefit or the propriety of requested agency action when the agency has denied the benefit or refused to take the particular action. The agency has the burden of proof when the appeal is from an agency determination to impose a penalty or reduce, terminate, or suspend a benefit previously granted. The party with the burden of proof on any issue has the burden of going forward, and the administrative law judge shall not make any ruling on the preponderance of evidence until the close of all evidence.

“(4a) New Evidence. — The petitioner shall be permitted to submit evidence regardless of whether obtained prior to or subsequent to the Department’s actions and regardless of whether the Department had an opportunity to consider the evidence in making its determination to deny, reduce, terminate or suspend a benefit. When such evidence is received, at the request of the Department, the administrative law judge shall continue the hearing for a minimum of 15 days and a maximum of 30 days to allow for the Department’s review of the evidence. Subsequent to review of the evidence, if the Department reverses its original decision, it shall immediately inform the administrative law judge.

“(4b) Issue for Hearing. — For each penalty imposed or benefit reduced, terminated, or suspended, the hearing shall determine whether the Department substantially prejudiced the rights of the petitioner and if the Department, based upon evidence at the hearing:

“a. Exceeded its authority or jurisdiction;

“b. Acted erroneously;

“c. Failed to use proper procedure;

“d. Acted arbitrarily or capriciously; or

“e. Failed to act as required by law or rule.

“(5) Decision. — The administrative law judge assigned to a contested Medicaid case shall hear and decide the case without unnecessary delay. The Office of Administrative Hearings shall send a copy of the audiotape or diskette of the hearing to the agency within five days of completion of the hearing. The judge shall prepare a written decision and send it to the parties. The decision must be sent together with the record to the agency within 20 days of the conclusion of the hearing.

“(h3) From funds available to the Department of Health and Human Services for the 2008-2009 fiscal year, the sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) shall be transferred by the Department of Health and Human Services to the Office of Administrative Hearings. These funds shall be allocated by the Office of Administrative Hearings for mediation services provided for Medicaid applicant and recipient appeals and to contract for other services necessary to conduct the appeals process.

“(h4) Effective October 1, 2008, the Department of Health and Human Services shall discontinue its current informal appeals process for Medicaid applicants and recipients appealing a determination made by the Department to deny, terminate, suspend, or reduce Medicaid covered services. All such informal appeals by Medicaid applicants or recipients under the current system which are pending on that date and for which a hearing has not been held shall be discontinued and the applicant or recipient offered an opportunity to appeal to the Office of Administrative Hearings in accordance with the provisions of subsection 10.15A(h1) of this act. The Department shall make every effort to resolve or settle all of the backlogged cases prior to the effective date of this act.

“(h5) Nothing in this act shall prevent the Department of Health and Human Services from engaging in an informal review of the case with the applicant or recipient prior to issuing a notice of adverse determination as provided by subsection 10.15A(h1) of this act.

“(h6) The appeals process for Medicaid applicants and recipients established under this section shall expire July 1, 2010. The Department of Health and Human Services and the Office of Administrative Hearings shall each report to the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, the Senate Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services, and the Fiscal Research Division on March 1, 2009, October 1, 2009, and March 1, 2010, on the costs, effectiveness, and efficiency of the appeals process for Medicaid applicants and recipients and make recommendations regarding the continuation of the process.”

Session Laws
2011-145, s. 10.28(a)-(e), provides: “(a) The Department of Health and Human Services (Department) shall submit a report annually from a qualified entity with proven experience in conducting actuarial and health care studies on the Medicaid cost-savings achieved by the CCNC networks, which shall include children, adults, and the aged, blind, and disabled, to the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, and the Fiscal Research Division.

“(b) The Department and the Division of Medical Assistance (DMA) shall enter into a three-party contract between North Carolina Community Care Networks, Inc., (NCCCN, Inc.) and each of the 14 participating local CCNC networks and shall require NCCCN, Inc., to provide standardized clinical and budgetary coordination, oversight, and reporting for a statewide Enhanced Primary Care Case Management System for Medicaid enrollees. The contracts shall require NCCCN, Inc., to build upon and expand the existing successful CCNC primary care case management model to include comprehensive statewide quantitative performance goals and deliverables which shall include all of the following areas: (i) service utilization management, (ii) budget analytics, (iii) budget forecasting methodologies, (iv) quality of care analytics, (v) participant access measures, and (vi) predictable cost containment methodologies.

“(c) NCCCN, Inc., shall report quarterly to the Department and to the Office of State Budget and Management (OSBM) on the development of the statewide Enhanced Primary Care Case Management System and its defined goals and deliverables as agreed upon in the contract. NCCCN, Inc., shall submit biannual reports to the Secretary of Health and Human Services, OSBM, the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, and the Fiscal Research Division on the progress and results of implementing the quantitative, analytical, utilization, quality, cost containment, and access goals and deliverables set out in the contract. NCCCN, Inc., shall conduct its own analysis of the CCNC system to identify any variations from the development plan for the Enhanced Primary Care Case Management System and its defined goals and deliverables set out in the contract between DMA and NCCCN, Inc. Upon identifying any variations, NCCCN, Inc., shall develop and implement a plan to address the variations. NCCCN, Inc., shall report the plan to DMA within 30 days after taking any action to implement the plan.

“(d) By January 1, 2012, the Department and OSBM shall assess the performance of NCCCN, Inc., and CCNC regarding the goals and deliverables established in the contract. Based on this assessment, the Department and DMA shall expand, cancel, or alter the contract with NCCCN, Inc., and CCNC effective April 1, 2012. Expansion or alteration of the contract may reflect refinements based on clearly identified goals and deliverables in the areas of quality of care, participant access, cost containment, and service delivery.

“(e) By July 1, 2012, the Department, DMA, and NCCCN, Inc., shall finalize a comprehensive plan that establishes management methodologies which include all of the following: (i) quality of care measures, (ii) utilization measures, (iii) recipient access measures, (iv) performance incentive models in which past experience indicates a benefit from financial incentives, (v) accountable budget models, (vi) shared savings budget models, and (vii) budget forecasting analytics as agreed upon by the Department, DMA, and NCCCN, Inc. In the development of these methodologies, the Department, DMA, and NCCCN, Inc., shall consider options for shared risk. The Department and DMA shall provide assistance to NCCCN, Inc., in meeting the objectives of this section.”

Session Laws
2011-145, s. 10.39, provides: “In order to ensure all claims presented by a provider for payment by the Department of Health and Human Services meet the Department’s medical necessity criteria and all other applicable Medicaid, Health Choice, or other federal or State documentation requirements, a provider may be required to undergo prepayment claims review by DHHS. Claims reviews conducted pursuant to this section shall be in accordance with the provisions of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, P.L. 111-148, and any implementing regulations.”

Session Laws
2011-145, s. 10.42(a)-(c), provides: “(a) The Department of Health and Human Services shall develop a two-year medication therapy management pilot program to be administered through Community Care of North Carolina (CCNC) in order to determine (i) the best method of adapting the ChecKmedsNC program to the Medicaid program and CCNC’s Medical Homes and (ii) the most effective and efficient role for community-based pharmacists as active members of CCNC’s care management teams. The pilot program created pursuant to this section shall consist of the following components:

“(1) Identification of at least 20 community-based pharmacies that are geographically distributed and sufficiently representative to generalize pilot findings among pharmacies that dedicate pharmacist time to work with patients, their care team members, and their Medical Home practices to improve patient outcomes. To the extent that available resources allow, other types of community-based pharmacists may be involved, including those working with long-term care residents or their attending physicians.

“(2) Targeting of Medicaid recipients with co-occurring illnesses or conditions that are especially susceptible to poor patient outcomes when medication is underused, misused, or poorly coordinated.

“(3) Allowing pharmacists identified pursuant to subdivision (1) of this section to have access to CCNC’s Web-based Pharmacy Portal, which allows CCNC to establish and monitor patients’ prescriptions and to communicate with other care team members.

“(b) On January 1, 2012, and every six months thereafter, CCNC shall report to the Department of Health and Human Services, the House and Senate Appropriations Subcommittees on Health and Human Services, and the Fiscal Research Division on the development and implementation of this pilot program. This reporting requirement shall terminate with the filing of the third report on January 1, 2013. In addition to any other information, the reports required by this section shall include the following additional information:

“(1) The July 1, 2012, report shall include an interim evaluation of the pharmacists’ demonstrated use of the CCNC Pharmacy Home Model and the pharmacists’ role in intervening and successfully managing the medication therapy of Medicaid recipients with chronic illnesses.

“(2) The January 1, 2013, report shall include an evaluation of the pharmacists’ role in CCNC’s management of Medicaid recipients with mental health diagnoses or who receive Home Health or Nursing Home care, and a determination of the appropriate per member/per month pharmacists should receive for participating in the Medical Home Model of CCNC.
